Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [343.41] PROHIBITION ON COLUMN E-REPORTABLE ANIMAL RESEARCH PROCEDURES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Animals in research prohibited. new text end new text begin A research facility as defined in United States Code, title 7, section 2132, in Minnesota must not conduct any research, teaching, surgery, experiment, study, or test if the activity is or would be reportable to the United States Department of Agriculture on APHIS Form 7023, Column E, or APHIS Form 7023B (Column E Explanation), pursuant to United States Code, title 7, section 2143, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 9, section 236. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application to certain activities. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to an activity required by federal law or regulation, including but not limited to Code of Federal Regulations, title 9, section 113. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application to federal facilities. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to a federal research facility, as defined in United States Code, title 7, section 2132. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [343.42] PENALTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Animals in research prohibited; penalties. new text end new text begin A testing facility or research facility that conducts any research, teaching, surgery, experiment, study, or test in violation of section 343.41, subdivision 1, must pay an administrative penalty of $10,000 for each animal subjected to the violation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Civil action; remedies. new text end new text begin In any judicial action for a violation according to this section in which the state has proven that the defendant's violation was willful, a court may order the defendant to reimburse the state an amount that the court determines is the reasonable value of litigation expenses incurred by the state. When determining the amount of litigation expenses to be reimbursed, the court must consider the economic circumstances of the defendant. new text end